Hawaii statutes.
§386-80 Examination by impartial physician.
The director of labor and industrial relations may appoint a duly qualified
impartial physician to examine the injured employee and to report. The fees
for such examination shall be paid from the funds appropriated by the
legislature for the use of the department of labor and industrial relations. [L
1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-79; HRS §386-80]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next